Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 34
FROZEN DESSERTS

35-34-101 to 35-34-112. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article repealed, p. 902, § 4, effective April 5.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 15 of chapter 7, C.R.S. 1963, and was not amended prior to its repeal in 1985. For the text of this article prior to 1985, consult the Colorado Statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning frozen desserts, see part 3 of article 5.5 of title 25.